North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Article 5. Office and Agent.

§ 55-5-01.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

History.

1901, c. 5; Rev., s. 1243; C.S., s. 1137; 1937, c. 133, ss. 1-3; G.S., ss. 55-38, 55-39; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, s. 17; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 101(a); 2001-358, ss. 44, 47(a); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 55-5-02 through 55-5-04.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 55D-31

through 55D-33 by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 44.